Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-912.02
Standard certification; reasonable impediment; grounds; Secretary of State, election commissioner, county clerk; duties.

(1) The Secretary of State shall provide a standard certification for a voter with a reasonable impediment preventing the voter from obtaining valid photographic identification. A voter with a reasonable impediment shall check to identify the applicable reasonable impediment box on the certification, which shall be limited to only the following reasons:

(a) Inability to obtain valid photographic identification due to:

(i) Disability or illness that prevents the voter from obtaining valid photographic identification; or

(ii) Lack of a birth certificate or other required documents and an inability to obtain a birth certificate or other required documents without significant difficulty or expense; or

(b) Religious objection to being photographed.

(2) The Secretary of State shall provide the form of the certification to the election commissioners and county clerks. A voter who has a reasonable impediment shall execute the certification under penalty of election falsification. The election commissioner or county clerk shall verify:

(a) The signature on the certification with the signature appearing on the voter registration record; and

(b) That the voter does not have a current, unexpired driver's license or state identification card issued by the State of Nebraska.

(3) A voter who casts a ballot by mail shall include the certification with the application, except that a voter who casts a ballot pursuant to section 32-953 shall include the certification within the ballot envelope.

Laws 2023, LB514, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 42.